Hawaii, session 2026, SB579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§196-     Distributed energy resources program; mandatory payout.  If a customer of a distributed energy resources program receives a bill credit for energy exports and does not use that bill credit within one year of generating the bill credit, the utility shall pay to the customer the amount of the unused bill credit.  Bill credits shall be used in the order of generation." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval, and shall apply to bill credits for energy exports accrued after the effective date of this Act. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________